Washington statutes.
RCW 8.08.120

Indebtedness is for general county purposes.

Any county purpose mentioned in RCW 8.08.090 through 8.08.130 shall be deemed and held to be a general county purpose and any indebtedness contracted or to be contracted therefor shall be deemed and held to be an indebtedness for general county purposes, and all the provisions of law of this state relative to indebtedness for general county purposes or the contracting of such indebtedness or the bonds for funding the same shall be deemed applicable to any indebtedness contracted or to be contracted or any bonds issued by any county under RCW 8.08.090 through 8.08.130, but the accounts of the county with respect to the receipts and disbursements of all moneys received or disbursed by the county under the provisions of RCW 8.08.090 through 8.08.130 shall, for each condemnation, appropriation and disposition, be so kept as to clearly and fully exhibit such accounts separate and apart from the other accounts of the county.

[ 1895 c 2 s 4; RRS s 904.]

NOTES:

Public contracts and indebtedness: Title 39 RCW.